Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to keep the public safe when on the road. Nationwide, 29 percent of all crash fatalities occurred in speed-related crashes in 2022. In 2023, more than 30 percent of fatal crashes involved speeding on Washington roads. Speeding continues to be a component of traffic deaths, and law enforcement is increasingly dealing with more speed-related incidents. The legislature finds that all Washington drivers are at risk when speeding is involved, and solutions to change public behavior are needed.Additionally, according to the American motor vehicle administration, more than 70 percent of people with suspended licenses continue to drive during the suspension period. By leveraging technology to enable individuals to continue driving and prevent speeding, the legislature intends to enhance road safety to promote safer driving habits and keep the public safe.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Excessive speeding" means traveling at:(1) 10 miles per hour or greater in excess of the posted speed limit, if the posted speed limit is 40 miles per hour or less; and(2) 20 miles per hour or greater in excess of the posted speed limit, if the posted speed limit is greater than 40 miles per hour.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Intelligent speed assistance device" means a technical device designed to be installed within a motor vehicle to actively monitor and prevent the driver from exceeding a preset limit. "Intelligent speed assistance device" does not include any technology that is provided by the vehicle manufacturer as a component of a new motor vehicle and that controls or affects the speed of a motor vehicle.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) A person may not drive a motor vehicle, unless it is equipped with a functioning intelligent speed assistance device, configured and programmed as provided in section 5(3) of this act, if the device is required:(a) For the issuance of a temporary restricted driver's license or an occupational driver's license, under the terms of RCW 46.20.391(4);(b) Under the applicable terms of probation under RCW 46.20.2892(1) or 46.61.500(4); or(c) Pursuant to court order under section 8 of this act or RCW 10.21.030.(2) The requirement to use the device under subsection (1) of this section with respect to a temporary restricted driver's license or occupational driver's license under RCW 46.20.391 remains in effect during the validity of any such license that has been issued to the person.(3)(a) A person who operates a motor vehicle with an intelligent speed assistance device remains exclusively responsible for the operation of the motor vehicle in a safe and lawful manner at all times.(b) The obligation under this section to use an intelligent speed assistance device is not a defense or mitigating circumstance to a violation of rules of the road, as set forth in law.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the installation of an intelligent speed assistance device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours. When the department receives a declaration under this subsection, it shall attach or imprint a notation on the person's driving record stating that the employer exemption applies.(b) The employer exemption does not apply when the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment.(5) Unless costs are waived by the intelligent speed assistance device company or the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, a person subject to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall pay the costs of installing, removing, and leasing the intelligent speed assistance device and shall pay an additional fee of $21 per month. Payments must be made directly to the intelligent speed assistance device company. The company shall remit the additional fee to the department to be deposited into the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account under section 9 of this act, except that the company may retain 25 cents per month of the additional fee to cover the expenses associated with administering the fee. The department may waive the monthly fee if the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010.(6) For a person restricted under this section who is residing outside of the state of Washington, the department may accept verification of installation of an intelligent speed assistance device by an intelligent speed assistance device company authorized to do business in the jurisdiction or within a 75 mile radius of the jurisdiction in which the person resides, provided the device meets any applicable requirements of that jurisdiction. The department may waive the monthly fee required in subsection (5) of this section if collection of the fee would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction.(7) The department may issue rules to implement this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) To be eligible to install, repair, maintain, monitor, or remove an intelligent speed assistance device, a person must apply to the department and meet the requirements as provided in this section.(2) An applicant seeking approval to install the device must submit a declaration to the department that the device is an intelligent speed assistance device as defined in section 3 of this act and, when installed in a vehicle, is configured and programmed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.(3)(a) An intelligent speed assistance device must employ a technology using a global positioning system and must be programmed to limit the velocity of a moving vehicle to the posted speed limit, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) The intelligent speed assistance device must include an override function to allow the vehicle to exceed the speed limit on no more than three occasions in each calendar month. The use of the override function under this subsection is subject to the requirements and limitations of RCW 46.61.425.(c) All data collected under this act must be securely maintained by an intelligent speed assistance device company and may not be shared with any third parties, except for data pertaining to installation and removal of the device, without a court order.(4) To maintain eligibility under this section, a person must submit the results of a criminal background check to the department annually for any individual that is hired to install, repair, maintain, monitor, or remove the device.(5) The department may issue rules regarding the application process and eligibility under this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped with an intelligent speed assistance device is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the restricted driver:(a) Tampers with the device or any components of the device, or otherwise interferes with the proper functionality of the device, by modifying, detaching, disconnecting, or otherwise disabling it to allow the restricted driver to operate the vehicle; or(b) Has, directs, authorizes, or requests another person to tamper with the device or any components of the device, or otherwise interfere with the proper functionality of the device, by modifying, detaching, disconnecting, or otherwise disabling it to allow the restricted driver to operate the vehicle.(2) A person who knowingly assists another person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped with an intelligent speed assistance device to circumvent the device or any components of the device, or otherwise interferes with the proper functionality of the device, or to start and operate that vehicle is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The provisions of this subsection do not apply if the starting of a motor vehicle, or the request to start a motor vehicle, equipped with an intelligent speed assistance device is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the device or the vehicle and the person subject to the court order does not operate the vehicle.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:Any data collected by an intelligent speed assistance device as defined in section 3 of this act is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:When sentencing a person convicted of any criminal offense under this chapter or a violation of any other provision of law that constitutes a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony, the court may impose, as a condition of probation, a requirement regarding the installation and use of a functioning intelligent speed assistance device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person. If the court finds that the person engaged in excessive speeding during the commission of the offense, the court shall impose the use of a functioning intelligent speed assistance device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less than six months.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:The intelligent speed assistance device revolving account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee assessed under section 4(5) of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for administering and operating the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account program, implementing effective strategies to reduce motor vehicle-related deaths and serious injuries related to excessive speed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) A manufacturer, distributor, or retailer of a motor vehicle is not liable for any loss, injury, or damages caused by the design, manufacture, installation, improper installation, use, or misuse of an intelligent speed assistance device. However, liability does exist if the manufacturer, distributor or retailer knowingly engages in a repair or update to the intelligent speed assistance device and such repair or update proximately causes loss, injury, or damage.(2) Nothing in this chapter requires a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer of a motor vehicle to manufacture, distribute, or offer for sale a motor vehicle that includes or is compatible with an intelligent speed assistance device.(3) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a lessor or lienholder from requiring that a motor vehicle lessee or owner notify the lessor or lienholder that an intelligent speed assistance device has been installed on a motor vehicle that is subject to a lease or finance agreement.Sec. 11. RCW 10.21.030 and 2018 c 276 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The judicial officer in any felony, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor case may at any time amend the order to impose additional or different conditions of release. The conditions imposed under this chapter supplement but do not supplant provisions of law allowing the imposition of conditions to assure the appearance of the defendant at trial or to prevent interference with the administration of justice.(2) Appropriate conditions of release under this chapter include, but are not limited to, the following:(a) The defendant may be placed in the custody of a pretrial release program;(b) The defendant may have restrictions placed upon travel, association, or place of abode during the period of release;(c) The defendant may be required to comply with a specified curfew;(d) The defendant may be required to return to custody during specified hours or to be placed on electronic monitoring, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, if available. The defendant, if convicted, may not have the period of incarceration reduced by the number of days spent on electronic monitoring;(e) The defendant may be required to comply with a program of home detention. For a felony offense, home detention is defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(f) The defendant may be prohibited from approaching or communicating in any manner with particular persons or classes of persons;(g) The defendant may be prohibited from going to certain geographical areas or premises;(h) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing any dangerous weapons or firearms;(i) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing or consuming any intoxicating liquors or drugs not prescribed to the defendant. The defendant may be required to submit to testing to determine the defendant's compliance with this condition;(j) The defendant may be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;(k) The defendant may be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an intelligent speed assistance device, as defined in section 3 of this act and configured and programmed as provided in section 5(3) of this act;(l) The defendant may be required to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of an officer of the court or other person or agency; and(((l)))(m) The defendant may be prohibited from committing any violations of criminal law.Sec. 12. RCW 46.20.2892 and 2021 c 240 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Whenever the official records of the department show that a person has committed a traffic infraction for a moving violation on three or more occasions within a one-year period, or on four or more occasions within a two-year period, the department must suspend the license of the driver for a period of 60 days and establish a period of probation for one calendar year to begin when the suspension ends. Prior to reinstatement of a license, the person must complete a safe driving course as recommended by the department. During the period of probation, and subject to the requirements of (b) of this subsection, the person must not be convicted of any additional traffic infractions for moving violations. Any traffic infraction for a moving violation committed during the period of probation shall result in an additional 30-day suspension to run consecutively with any suspension already being served.(b)(i) During the first 120 days of the period of probation, following the period of suspension for an accumulation of moving violations under this section in which one or more of the violations is for excessive speeding, as defined in section 2 of this act, the person may not operate a vehicle upon which a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device has not been installed. The operation of a vehicle without such a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device is a traffic infraction.(2) When a person has committed a traffic infraction for a moving violation on two occasions within a one-year period or three occasions within a two-year period, the department shall send the person a notice that an additional infraction will result in suspension of the person's license for a period of 60 days.(3) The department may not charge a reissue fee at the end of the term of suspension under this section.(4) For purposes of this section, multiple traffic infractions issued during or as the result of a single traffic stop constitute one occasion.(5) A person who is required to operate a motor vehicle with an intelligent speed assistance device under subsection (1) of this section remains exclusively responsible for operation of the motor vehicle in a safe and lawful manner at all times. The obligation under subsection (1) of this section to use an intelligent speed assistance device is not a defense or mitigating circumstance to a violation of rules of the road, as set forth in law.Sec. 13. RCW 46.20.391 and 2021 c 240 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, may submit to the department an application for a temporary restricted driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue a temporary restricted driver's license and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394.(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or respond pursuant to RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the department for an occupational driver's license.(b) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation.(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is eligible to receive such license only if:(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle;(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of successful educational completion;(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in meetings of a ((twelve-step))12-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed and the program requires a driver's license;(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer than ((fourteen))14 days; and(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the occupational driver's license shall be canceled. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.(4)(a)(i) If a person has applied for a temporary restricted driver's license because the person's license has been suspended under RCW 46.61.500(2), the terms of a license issued under this section must require the person to use a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device while operating a motor vehicle.(ii) If a person has applied for an occupational driver's license because the person's license has been suspended administratively as a result of an accumulation of moving violations under RCW 46.20.2892, and at least one of the violations was for excessive speeding, the terms of an occupational driver's license issued under this section must require the person to use a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device while operating a motor vehicle.(b) A person subject to the requirements in (a) of this subsection may not operate a motor vehicle without such a properly functioning device during the duration of the license.(c)(i) A person who operates a motor vehicle with an intelligent speed assistance device remains exclusively responsible for the operation of the motor vehicle in a safe and lawful manner at all times.(ii) The obligation under this subsection (4) to use an intelligent speed assistance device is not a defense or mitigating circumstance to a violation of rules of the road, as set forth in law.(5) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.(((5)))(6) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary restricted driver's license after receiving notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has been convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any other act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person whose occupational or temporary restricted driver's license has been canceled under this section may reapply for a new occupational or temporary restricted driver's license if he or she is otherwise qualified under this section and pays the fee required under RCW 46.20.380.Sec. 14. RCW 46.61.500 and 2020 c 330 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving. ((Violation))Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, violation of the provisions of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days and by a fine of not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000.(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of any person convicted of reckless driving shall be suspended by the department for not less than ((thirty))30 days.(b) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under an administrative action arising out of the same incident. In the case of a person whose day-for-day credit is for a period equal to or greater than the period of suspension required under this section, the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension under this section, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit. During any period of suspension, revocation, or denial due to a conviction for reckless driving as the result of a charge originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, any person who has obtained an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 may continue to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to the provision of the ignition interlock driver's license without obtaining a separate temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.(3)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, a person convicted of reckless driving who has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.(b) A person convicted of reckless driving shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(4)(a) Following the period of suspension under subsection (2) of this section, the department must establish a period of probation for 150 days. During the period of probation, the person may not operate a vehicle upon which a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device has not been installed.(b) The operation of a vehicle without such a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device following the suspension as provided in (a) of this subsection is a traffic infraction.(c) Any traffic infraction for a moving violation committed during the period of probation shall result in an additional 30-day suspension or revocation to run consecutively with any suspension already being served.(d) A person who is required to operate a motor vehicle with an intelligent speed assistance device under this subsection (4) remains exclusively responsible for operation of the motor vehicle in a safe and lawful manner at all times. The obligation to use an intelligent speed assistance device is not a defense or mitigating circumstance to a violation of rules of the road, as set forth in law.Sec. 15. RCW 43.84.092 and 2024 c 210 s 5 and 2024 c 168 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. This act may be known and cited as the BEAM act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. Sections 4 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 46.20 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. This act takes effect January 1, 2029.--- END ---